Washington statutes.
RCW 28B.109.040

Washington international exchange student scholarships.

If funds are available, the office shall select students yearly to receive a Washington international exchange student scholarship from funds appropriated to the office for this purpose, or from any private donations, or from any other funds given to the office for this program.

[ 2012 c 198 s 23; 2011 1st sp.s. c 11 s 198; 1996 c 253 s 404.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2012 c 198: See note following RCW 70A.15.5110.

Effective date—2011 1st sp.s. c 11 ss 101-103, 106-202, 204-244, and 301: See note following RCW 28B.76.020.

Intent—2011 1st sp.s. c 11: See note following RCW 28B.76.020.

Findings—Purpose—Severability—Part headings not law—1996 c 253: See notes following RCW 28B.109.010.